Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
CHAPTER 3 Wildlife Generally

Cross references.

Cruelty to animals, §

16-12-4

.

Penalty for unlawful taking of wildlife generally, §

27-1-3

.

Unlawful acts relating to taking, sale, purchase of wildlife, §

27-1-28

et seq.

Consent of state to acquisition by United States of lands for forest and wildlife purposes, §

50-2-25

.